Utah statutes.
17D-2-602.   Contesting the legality of a resolution or other proceeding -- No cause of action after contest period.

(1)  For a period of 30 days after publication of a resolution or other proceeding under Subsection 17D-2-601(1) or a notice under Subsection 17D-2-601(2), any person in interest may file an action in district court contesting the regularity, formality, or legality of:

(a)  a resolution or other proceeding;

(b)  any bonds or a lease agreement authorized by a resolution or other proceeding; or

(c)  any provision made for the security or payment of local building authority bonds or lease agreement.

(2)  After the period referred to in Subsection (1), no one may have a cause of action to contest for any reason the regularity, formality, or legality of any of the matters listed in Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 369, 2012 General Session

